Hawaii statutes.
[§46-164] Procedures. Any county
modifying its zoning ordinance or enacting a local law pursuant to this part
shall follow the procedure for adopting and amending its ordinances. [L
1998, c 296, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next